District of Columbia statutes.
29-709.03

Proper plaintiff.

A derivative action shall be maintained only by a person that is a partner at the time the action is commenced and:

(1)

That was a partner when the conduct giving rise to the action occurred; or

(2)

Whose status as a partner devolved upon the person by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the partnership agreement from a person that was a partner at the time of the conduct.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1003 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).